Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1730
Marketing plan; advertising; commercial symbol; requirements.

In selling, leasing, or offering to sell or lease a seller-assisted marketing plan in this state, sellers of such plans shall not use the trademark, service mark, trade name, logotype, advertising, or other commercial symbol of any business which does not either control the ownership interest in the seller or accept responsibility for all representations made by the seller in regard to the seller-assisted marketing plan, unless the nature of the seller's relationship to such other business entity is set forth immediately adjacent to and in type size equal to or larger than that used to depict the commercial symbol of such other business. If a member of a trade association, the seller may use the logo or registration mark of the trade association in advertisements and materials without regard to this section.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 30.